Utah statutes.
53-3-1003.   Licenses required -- Inspections.

(1)  An ignition interlock system provider may be certified to facilitate installation of ignition interlock systems only if the provider applies for and obtains a license from the division.

(2)  A person may act as an ignition interlock system installer only if the person applies for and obtains a license from the division.

(3)  The division shall inspect the provider facilities and equipment of applicants and licensees and examine applicants for provider licenses and installer licenses.

(4)  The division shall administer and enforce this part.



Enacted by Chapter 421, 2011 General Session

